North Dakota, session 69, HB1068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 23-01-05.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23-01-05.5. Autopsy reports, working papers, and images - Confidential - Exceptions.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Autopsy report" means the report of the forensic examiner or the examiner's designee
on the post-mortem examination of a deceased individual to determine the cause and
manner of death, including any written analysis, diagram, photograph, or toxicological
test results.
b. "Notes" means the notes or dictations taken or created by the state forensic examiner or
the examiner's designee during the course of an investigation into the cause and manner
of death of a decedent.
c. "Report of death" means the official findings on the cause of death and manner of death
issued by the state forensic examiner, the examiner's designee, county coroner, or
pathologist performing an autopsy ordered by a county coroner or by the state forensic
examiner and which is the face page of the autopsy report identifying the decedent and
stating the cause of death and manner of death.
d. "Working papers" means the medical records, investigatory records, law enforcement
records, and other records or materials collected or compiled by the state forensic
examiner or the examiner's designee and the notes or dictations created by the state
forensic examiner or the examiner's designee during the course of an investigation into
the cause and manner of death of a decedent. The term does not include autopsy
photographs or other visual images or video or audio recordings of an autopsy taken by
the state forensic examiner, the examiner's designee, prosecutor, criminal justice agency,
any employee or agent of a criminal justice agency, or any other individual, or other
photographs or visual images of the decedent which may have been taken by law
enforcement or other individuals.
2. An autopsy report and any working papers and notes relating to an autopsy report are
confidential and may be disclosed only as permitted by this section. The report of death is
subject to disclosure as follows:
a. TheIf requested before the report of death becomes a public record, the next of kin or
authorized representative requesting the report of death is responsible for providing to
the state forensic examiner or the examiner's designee satisfactory proof of relationship
to the deceased and contact information for notification of the report of death.
b. When in receipt of the information in subdivision a, the state forensic examiner,
examiner's designee, county coroner, or pathologist who performed the autopsy shall

H. B. NO. 1068 - PAGE 2
make a good faith effort to immediately notify the decedent's next of kin or authorized
representative of the availability of the report of death. The notification or attempts to
notify the next of kin or authorized representative must be recorded and must precede
any public disclosure of the report of death.
c. The report of death becomes a public record eight days after the report of death is
finalized.
3. Subject to the limitations on the disclosure of an autopsy photograph or other visual image or
video or audio recording of an autopsy required under section 44-04-18.18, any
workingWorking papers and notes relating to a final autopsy report may be disclosed pursuant
to a court order in accordance with section 44 - 04 - 18.11 and as otherwise expressly provided
by law subsection 5 .
4. An autopsy report is confidential and may be disclosed in accordance with section
44 - 04 - 18.11 and subsections 5 and 6 .
5. The state forensic examiner or the examiner's designee shall disclose a copy of the autopsy
report and working papers to:
a. To anyA county coroner, including a coroner in any state or Canadian province, with
jurisdiction over the death, and the coroner may use or disclose these records for
purposes of an investigation, inquest, or prosecution.
b. To any state's attorneyA prosecutor or criminal justice agency, as defined by section
44 - 04 - 18.7 , including a prosecutor or criminal justice agency of the United States, any
state, or any Canadian province, with jurisdiction over an investigation of the death and
the state's attorneyprosecutor or criminal justice agency may use or disclose these
records for the purposes of an investigation or prosecution.
c. To workforceWorkforce safety and insurance if the death is related to the decedent's
work, and to any other workers' compensation or other similar program, established by
law, that provides benefits for work-related injuries or illness without regard to fault if
there is no criminal investigation.
d. To theThe child fatality review panel if there is no active criminal investigation.
e. The suicide fatality review commission if there is no active criminal investigation.
f. In accordance with a court order.
5.6. TheIf there is no active criminal investigation, the state forensic examiner or the examiner's
designee upon request shall disclose a copy of the autopsy report to:
a. The decedent's personal representative and to the.
b. The decedent's spouse, child eighteen years of age or older, or parent, upon proof of the
relationship, if there is no active criminal investigation.
b.c. A physician or hospital whothat treated the deceaseddecedent immediately prior tobefore
death if there is no active criminal investigation.
c.d. An insurance company upon proof that the decedent's life was covered by a policy
issued by the company if there is no active criminal investigation.
d.e. The food and drug administration, the national transportation safety board, the
occupational health and safety administration, and any other federal or state agency with
authority to obtain an autopsy report to investigate a death resulting from the decedent's
type of injury or illness.

H. B. NO. 1068 - PAGE 3
e.f. A professional or research organization collecting data to initiate or advance death
investigation standards, after the identifiers necessary to create a limited data set under
title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 164, section 514, subsection e have been
removed from the report.
g. The maternal mortality review committee.
6.7. An autopsy photograph or other visual image or a video or audio recording of an autopsy
taken by the state forensic examiner, the examiner's designee, prosecutor, criminal justice
agency, any employee or agent of a criminal justice agency, or any other individual is
confidential and may be disclosed in accordance with section 44 - 04 - 18.11 and as provided in
this subsection:
a. The state forensic examiner or the examiner's designee shall, upon request, disclose a
copy of autopsy photographs or other visual images or video or audio recordings of an
autopsy to any prosecutor or criminal justice agency as defined by section 44 - 04 - 18.7 ,
including a prosecutor or criminal justice agency of the United States, any state, or any
Canadian province, with jurisdiction over an investigation of the death and the prosecutor
or criminal justice agency may use or disclose these records for the purposes of an
investigation or prosecution.
b. After redacting all information identifying the decedent, including name, address, and
social security number, and anonymizing facial recognition, a medical examiner, coroner,
or physician may use an autopsy photograph, image, or video or audio recording for:
(1) Medical or scientific teaching or training purposes;
(2) Teaching or training of law enforcement personnel;
(3) Teaching or training of attorneys or others with a bona fide professional need to use
or understand forensic science;
(4) Conferring with medical or scientific experts;
(5) Publication in a scientific or medical journal or textbook; or
(6) Teaching or training of coroner personnel or other licensed or certified medical
professionals.
c. The decedent's spouse, child eighteen years of age or older, or parent, upon proof of the
relationship, may view an autopsy photograph, image, or recording in the business office
of a medical examiner, coroner, or physician who has possession of the materials, if
there is not an active criminal investigation or prosecution.
d. Upon receipt by the requestor of a court order requiring disclosure and a court-issued
protective order in accordance with section 44 - 04 - 18.11, the state forensic examiner or
the examiner's designee shall disclose a copy of autopsy photographs or other visual
images or video or audio recordings of an autopsy to the decedent's spouse, child
eighteen years of age or older, or parent, upon proof of the relationship.
8. Other photographs or visual images of the decedent in the possession of the forensic
examiner, the examiner's designee, or any county coroner which may have been taken by law
enforcement or other persons are confidential.
9. Notes are confidential records.
10. The forensic examiner, the examiner's designee, any county coroner or county medical
coroner, and any public employee who, in good faith, discloses autopsy findings, an autopsy
report, working papers, autopsy photograph, notes, other photographs or visual images of a

H. B. NO. 1068 - PAGE 4
decedent, or a video or audio recording of an autopsy, or other information relating to an
autopsy report or cause of death to a person who the public official or employee reasonably
believes is entitled to that information under this section is immune from any liability, civil or
criminal, for making that disclosure. For the purposes of any proceeding, the good faith of any
public employee who makes a disclosure under this section is presumed.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 43-10-10.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-10-10.1. Funeral practice - Exceptions.
1. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent a person from doing work within the
standards and ethics of that person's profession and calling, provided that the person does not
represent to the public that the person is engaging in the practice of funeral service.
2. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent embalming by commissioned medical
officers in the armed forces of the United States or under the United States public health
service while on active duty in a respective service.
3. This chapter does not prevent the transportation of a dead human body in accordance with
other applicable state and federal laws.
4. This chapter does not prohibit ambulance or other emergency transportation of a dead human
body.
5. This chapter does not prohibit members of the clergy from performing funeral and gravesite or
memorial services.
6. This chapter does not prohibit unlicensed individuals, employed by a funeral establishment,
from performing gravesite or memorial services for cremated remains.
7. This chapter does not prohibit individuals licensed in other states, as embalmers or funeral
directors, from assisting funeral practitioners.
7.8. This chapter does not prohibit individuals employed by a funeral establishment from
performing nonprofessional tasks or activities that do not require independent, professional
judgment under the supervision of an individual licensed to practice funeral service.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 44-04-18.18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
44-04-18.18. Autopsy images - Confidential - Exceptions.
1. An autopsy photograph or other visual image or a video or audio recording of an autopsy is
confidential. However, a criminal justice agency may use or disclose these materials for
purposes of an investigation or prosecution.
2. a. After redacting all information identifying the decedent, including name, address, and
social security number, and anonymizing facial recognition, a medical examiner, coroner,
or physician may use an autopsy photograph, image, or recording for:
(1) Medical or scientific teaching or training purposes;
(2) Teaching or training of law enforcement personnel;
(3) Teaching or training of attorneys or others with a bona fide professional need to use
or understand forensic science;
(4) Conferring with medical or scientific experts;

H. B. NO. 1068 - PAGE 5
(5) Publication in a scientific or medical journal or textbook; or
(6) Teaching or training of coroner personnel or other licensed or certified medical
professionals.
b. A medical examiner, coroner, or physician who has in good faith complied with this
subsection is not subject to any penalty or liability for using an autopsy photograph,
image, or recording.
3. The decedent's spouse, child, parent, or sibling, upon proof of the relationship, may view an
autopsy photograph, image, or recording in the business office of a medical examiner,
coroner, or physician who has possession of the materials, if there is not an active criminal
investigation or prosecution.
4. Disclosure of an autopsy photograph, image, or recording may be obtained under section
44-04-18.11An autopsy photograph or other visual image or a video or audio recording of an
autopsy taken by the state forensic examiner, the examiner's designee, prosecutor, criminal
justice agency, any employee or agent of the criminal justice agency, or any other individual is
confidential and may be disclosed in accordance with section 23 - 01 - 05.5 .

H. B. NO. 1068 - PAGE 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1068.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State